Utah statutes.
63C-1-102.   Definitions.
As used in this title:
(1)  "Advisory board," "advisory commission," and "advisory council" means a
board, commission, or council that:
(a)  provides advice and makes recommendations to another person or entity who
makes policy for the benefit of the general public;
(b)  is created by and whose duties are provided by statute or by executive
order; and
(c)  performs its duties only under the supervision of another person as
provided by statute.
(2)  "Review board," "review commission," or "review council" means a board,
commission, or council that:
(a)  possesses a portion of the sovereign power of the state only to the
extent to enable it to approve policy made for the benefit of the general
public by another body or person;
(b)  is created by and whose duties are provided by statute;
(c)  performs its duties according to its own rules without supervision other
than under the general control of another person as provided by statute; and
(d)  is permanent and continuous and not temporary and occasional.
(3)  "Policy board," "policy commission," or "policy council" means a board,
commission, or council that:
(a)  possesses a portion of the sovereign power of the state to enable it to
make policy for the benefit of the general public;
(b)  is created by and whose duties are provided by the constitution or by
statute;
(c)  performs its duties according to its own rules without supervision other
than under the general control of another person as provided by statute; and
(d)  is permanent and continuous and not temporary and occasional.
